Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

CHAPTER 11. ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 11.001. DEPARTMENT; COMMISSIONER. The Department of Agriculture is under the direction of the commissioner of agriculture, who is responsible for exercising the powers and performing the duties assigned to the department by this code or other law.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 11.002. HEADQUARTERS. The department headquarters are in Austin.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 11.003. SUNSET PROVISION. The Department of Agriculture is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the department is abolished September 1, 2035.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 183, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 729, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 419, Sec. 9.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1227 (H.B. 1116), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 928 (H.B. 3249), Sec. 2.01, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (S.B. 1659), Sec. 3.01, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 11.004. ELECTION AND TERM OF COMMISSIONER. The commissioner is elected for a term of four years.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 11.005. QUALIFICATIONS. (a) To be eligible for election as commissioner or appointment to fill a vacancy in the office of commissioner, a person must:

(1) have been engaged, for at least five of the 10 years preceding the year in which the person is elected or appointed to the person's initial term, in the business of agriculture;

(2) have worked, for the five-year period preceding the calendar year in which the person is elected or appointed to the person's initial term, for a state or federal agency in a position directly related to agriculture;

(3) have owned or operated, for at least five of the 10 years preceding the year in which the person is elected or appointed to the person's initial term, farm, ranch, or timber land that qualifies for agricultural use appraisal under Subchapter C, Chapter 23, Tax Code, and be participating, in the calendar year in which the person is elected or appointed to the person's initial term, in a farm program administered by the federal Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service; or

(4) have worked, for at least five years at any time before the calendar year in which the person is elected or appointed to the person's initial term, for the Texas Agricultural Council, an organization that is a member of the Texas Agricultural Council, or another agricultural producer association.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person is engaged in the business of agriculture if the person is engaged, for the purpose of wholesale or retail sale, in:

(1) the production of crops for human or animal consumption, or planting seed;

(2) floriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or aquaculture;

(3) the raising or keeping of livestock; or

(4) the processing of any of the products listed in Subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 230, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 9.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 11.007. DEPUTY COMMISSIONER. (a) The commissioner shall appoint a deputy commissioner. In order to serve as deputy commissioner, a person must have practical knowledge of agriculture, horticulture, manufacturing, and related industries and of the proper method of marketing the products of those industries.

(b) The deputy commissioner shall take the oath of office required of the commissioner.

(c) The deputy commissioner shall perform duties assigned by the commissioner. In addition, the deputy commissioner shall perform the duties assigned by law to the commissioner during a necessary and unavoidable absence of the commissioner or during the commissioner's inability to act.

(d) The deputy commissioner serves at the will of the commissioner.

(e) The state shall pay the expenses incurred by the deputy commissioner while traveling on the business of the office under the direction of the commissioner.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 11.008. FUNDS OF THE DEPARTMENT. Except as otherwise provided by law, all money paid to the department is subject to Subchapter F, Chapter 404, Government Code.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1017, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 419, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.